src/fst/stems/numerals.lexc
!! Numerals
!  --------
!! Numerals in the Aleut language are numbers.

LEXICON Numerals
ataqan num "1" ;
aalax num "2" ; ! E
alax num "2" ; ! A
qaankun num "3" ; ! E
qankus num "3" ; ! A
sichin num "4" ; ! E
siching num "4" ; ! A
chaang num "5" ;
atuung num "6" ;
uluung num "7" ;
qamchiing num "8" ;
siching num "9" ;
hatix̂ num  "10" ;

aigidim tens "20" ;
qankudim tens "30" ;
sichidim tens "40" ;
chaangidim tens "50" ;
atuungidim tens "60" ;
uluungidim tens "70" ;
qamchiingidim tens "80" ;
sichiingidim tens "90" ;

LEXICON num
+Num+Sg+Abs: # ;

LEXICON tens
+Num+Sg+Abs: # ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
